Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.775

Use and maintenance of statewide list.

Only voters who appear on the official statewide voter registration list are eligible to participate in elections. Each county shall maintain a copy of that county's portion of the state list. The county must ensure that voter registration data used for the production, issuance, and processing of ballots in the administration of each election are the same as the official statewide voter registration list.

[ 2011 c 10 s 19; 2005 c 246 s 20; 2004 c 267 s 136.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—2005 c 246: See note following RCW 10.64.140.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.